nl: Classificatie van tractorbandprofielen: F-2 (2-ribs stuurband); F-2M (4-ribs stuurband); F-3 (Gladde stuurband); G-1 (Golf/Gazon); R-1 (Trekkerprofiel); R-1W (Diep trekkerprofiel); R-2 (Extra diep modderprofiel); R-3 (Gras); R-4 (Industrieel); Overig
ja: トラクタータイヤのトレッド分類: F-2（2リブフロント）; F-2M（4リブフロント）; F-3（スムースフロント）; G-1（ゴルフ/ターフ）; R-1（農業）; R-1W（深層農業）; R-2（米/田）; R-3（芝）; R-4（工業用）; その他
zh-CN: 拖拉机轮胎胎面花纹分类: F-2（前轮双肋）; F-2M（前轮四肋）; F-3（前轮光面）; G-1（高尔夫/草坪）; R-1（农业）; R-1W（深耕农业）; R-2（水稻/水田）; R-3（草坪）; R-4（工业）; 其他
tr: Traktör lastiği diş deseni sınıflandırması: F-2 (2 kaburgalı ön); F-2M (4 nervürlü ön); F-3 (Pürüzsüz ön); G-1 (Golf/Çim); R-1 (Tarım); R-1W (Derin dişli tarımsal); R-2 (Pirinç/Çeltik); R-3 (Çim); R-4 (Endüstriyel); Diğer
lt-LT: Traktoriaus padangos protektoriaus klasifikacija: F-2 (2 briaunų priekinė dalis); F-2M (4 briaunų priekis); F-3 (lygus priekis); G-1 (golfas/veja); R-1 (žemės ūkio); R-1W (gilus žemės ūkis); R-2 (ryžiai / ryžių laukas); R-3 (veja); R-4 (pramoninis); Kita
cs: Klasifikace dezénu traktorové pneumatiky: F-2 (dvoužebrová přední); F-2M (čtyřžebrová přední); F-3 (hladká přední); G-1 (golf/trávník); R-1 (zemědělská); R-1W (zemědělská záběrová); R-2 (rýže / rýžová pole); R-3 (trávníková); R-4 (průmyslová); Jiné
pt-BR: Classificação dos padrões de banda de rodagem dos pneus de tratores: Pneu dianteiro com duas nervuras; Pneu dianteiro com quatro nervuras; Pneu dianteiro liso; Pneu para gramado e golfe; Pneu agrícola padrão; Pneu agrícola de banda profunda; Pneu agrícola para arrozais; Pneu para gramado; Pneu industrial; Outro
vi: Phân loại gai lốp máy kéo: F-2 (Lốp trước 2 gờ); F-2M (Lốp trước 4 gờ); F-3 (Lốp trước bề mặt nhẵn); G-1 (Sân golf/bãi cỏ); R-1 (Nông nghiệp); R-1W (Nông nghiệp rãnh sâu); R-2 (Ruộng lúa/đầm lầy); R-3 (Bãi cỏ); R-4 (Công nghiệp); Khác
da: Klassificering af traktordæk: F-2 (2-ribbet forside); F-2M (4-ribbet forside); F-3 (Glat front); G-1 (Golf/græs); R-1 (Landbrug); R-1W (Dybt landbrug); R-2 (Ris/paddy); R-3 (Græs); R-4 (Industriel); Andet
ro-RO: Clasificarea benzii de rulare a anvelopei de tractor: F-2 (frontal cu 2 nervuri); F-2M (frontal cu 4 nervuri); F-3 (frontal neted); G-1 (golf/gazon); R-1 (agricol); R-1W (agricol profund); R-2 (orez/orezărie); R-3 (gazon); R-4 (industrial); Altele
fr: Classification de la bande de roulement du pneu de tracteur: F-2 (avant à 2 nervures); F-2M (avant à 4 nervures); F-3 (avant lisse); G-1 (golf/gazon); R-1 (agricole); R-1W (agricole profonde); R-2 (riz/rizière); R-3 (gazon); R-4 (industriel); Autre
ko: 트랙터 타이어 트레드 분류: F-2(2리브 전륜형); F-2M(4리브 전륜형); F-3(평면 전륜형); G-1(골프/잔디용); R-1(농경용); R-1W(심부 농경용); R-2(습전/수조용); R-3(잔디용); R-4(산업용); 기타
es: Clasificación de la banda de rodadura de los neumáticos de tractor: F-2 (parte delantera de 2 costillas); F-2M (parte delantera de 4 costillas); F-3 (Frente liso); G-1 (Golf/Césped); R-1 (Agrícola); R-1W (Agricultura profunda); R-2 (Arroz/Cáscara); R-3 (Césped); R-4 (Industrial); Otros
nb: Klassifisering for traktordekks slitebane: F-2 (2-ribbet foran); F-2M (4-ribbet front); F-3 (Glatt front); G-1 (Golf/Turf); R-1 (Landbruk); R-1W (Dyp jordbruk); R-2 (Ris/Paddy); R-3 (Gress); R-4 (Industriell); Annet
fi: Traktorin renkaiden kulutuspinnan luokitus: F-2 (kaksiripainen etuosa); F-2M (neliripainen etuosa); F-3 (tasainen etuosa); G-1 (golf/nurmikko); R-1 (maatalouskäyttö); R-1W (syvä maatalouskuvio); R-2 (riisipelto); R-3 (nurmi); R-4 (teollinen); Muu
zh-TW: 拖拉機輪胎胎面分類: F-2 (2 排前輪); F-2M (4 個前方羅紋); F-3 (光滑前輪); G-1 (高爾夫場/草坪); R-1 (農業); R-1W (深耕); R-2 (稻田); R-3 (草地); R-4 (工業); 其他
hr-HR: Klasifikacija gazišta traktorskih guma: F-2 (prednji profil s dva rebra); F-2M (predni profil s 4 rebra); F-3 (glatki prednji profil; G-1 (golf / travnati profil); R-1 (poljoprivredni profil); R-1W (duboki poljoprivredni profil); R-2 (profil za rižina polja / blatni teren); R-3 (profil za travnjak); R-4 (industrijski profil); Ostalo
de: Klassifizierung des Traktorreifenprofils: F-2 (2-Rippen-Vorderteil); F-2M (4-Rippen-Vorderteil); F-3 (Glatte Vorderseite); G-1 (Golf/Rasen); R-1 (Landwirtschaft); R-1W (Intensive Landwirtschaft); R-2 (Reis/Paddy); R-3 (Rasen); R-4 (Industriegebiet); Sonstiges
en: Tractor tire tread classification: F-2 (2-rib front); F-2M (4-rib front); F-3 (Smooth front); G-1 (Golf/Turf); R-1 (Agricultural); R-1W (Deep agricultural); R-2 (Rice/Paddy); R-3 (Turf); R-4 (Industrial); Other
hu: Traktor gumiabroncsok futófelületének besorolása: F-2 (2 bordás elülső rész); F-2M (4 bordás elülső rész); F-3 (sima elülső rész); G-1 (golf/gyep); R-1 (mezőgazdasági); R-1W (mély, mezőgazdasági); R-2 (rizs/hántolatlan); R-3 (gyep); R-4 (ipari); Egyéb
sk-SK: Klasifikácia dezénu pneumatík traktorov: F-2 (predná 2-rebrová); F-2M (predná 4-rebrová); F-3 (predná, hladká); G-1 (golf/trávnaté plochy); R-1 (poľnohospodársky); R-1W (hlboký poľnohospodársky); R-2 (ryža/ryžové pole); R-3 (trávnaté plochy); R-4 (priemyselný); Iné
sl-SI: Razvrstitev profilov traktorskih pnevmatik: F-2 (spredaj z dvema rebroma); F-2M (spredaj s 4 rebri); F-3 (gladka sprednja stran); G-1 (golf/trava); R-1 (kmetijstvo); R-1W (globoko kmetijsko); R-2 (riž/neoluščen); R-3 (trava); R-4 (Industrijsko); Druga
th: การจำแนกประเภทดอกยางรถแทรกเตอร์: F-2 (ยางหน้า 2 ริ้ว); F-2M (ยางหน้า 4 ริ้ว); F-3 (ยางหน้าเรียบ); G-1 (สนามกอล์ฟ/สนามหญ้า); R-1 (เกษตรกรรม); R-1W (เกษตรกรรมงานหนัก); R-2 (ข้าว/นาข้าว); R-3 (สนามหญ้า); R-4 (อุตสาหกรรม); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Класификация на протектора на гумите за трактор: F–2 (2-ребърна отпред); F-2M (4 ребра отпред); F–3 (гладка предна част); G–1 (Голф/Тревна площ); R–1 (Селскостопанско); R–1W (Дълбоко земеделие); R–2 (Ориз/оризови полета); R–3 (Тревна площ); R–4 (Индустриалено); Друго
sv: Mönstertyp för traktordäck: F-2 (2-ribbig front); F-2M (4-ribbig front); F-3 (Slät front); G-1 (Golf/Turf); R-1 (Jordbruk); R-1W (Djupgående jordbruk); R-2 (Ris/paddy); R-3 (Träs); R-4 (Industriell); Annat
it: Classificazione del battistrada degli pneumatici del trattore: F-2 (anteriore a 2 costole); F-2M (anteriore a 4 costole); F-3 (fronte liscio); G-1 (Golf/Erba); R-1 (Agricolo); R-1W (Agricoltura profonda); R-2 (Riso/Risaia); R-3 (erba); R-4 (Industriale); Altro
el: Κατηγοριοποίηση πέλματος ελαστικού τρακτέρ: F-2 (μπροστινό 2-πλευρών); F-2M (4-πλευρά μπροστά); F-3 (Λείο μέτωπο); G-1 (Γκολφ/Χλοοτάπητας); R-1 (Γεωργικά); R-1W (Βαθιά γεωργική); R-2 (Ρύζι/Ρυζόγαλο); R-3 (Τάρτα); R-4 (Βιομηχανικό); Άλλο
ru: Классификация протектора тракторной шины: F-2 (2-реберный передний); F-2M (4-реберный передний); F-3 (Гладкий передний); G-1 (Гольф/Газон); R-1 (Сельское хозяйство); R-1W (Глубокое сельскохозяйственное земледелие); R-2 (Рисовое поле/Чек); R-3 (Газон); R-4 (Промышленность); Другое
pl: Klasyfikacja bieżnika opon ciągnikowych: F-2 (2-żebrowa przednia); F-2M (4-żebrowa przednia); F-3 (gładka przednia); G-1 (golf / trawnik); R-1 (rolnicza); R-1W (głęboka rolnicza); R-2 (ryżowa / bagienna); R-3 (trawnikowa); R-4 (przemysłowa); Inne
pt-PT: Classificação do piso dos pneus de trator: F-2 (Dianteiro de 2 nervuras); F-2M (Dianteiro de 4 nervuras); F-3 (Dianteiro liso); G-1 (Golfe/Relvado); R-1 (Agrícola); R-1W (Agrícola profundo); R-2 (Arroz/Albufeira); R-3 (Relva); R-4 (Industrial); Outro